Washington statutes.
RCW 9.91.060

Leaving children unattended in parked automobile.

Every person having the care and custody, whether temporary or permanent, of minor children under the age of twelve years, who shall leave such children in a parked automobile unattended by an adult while such person enters a tavern or other premises where vinous, spirituous, or malt liquors are dispensed for consumption on the premises shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1999 c 143 s 9; 1951 c 270 s 17.]

NOTES:

Leaving children unattended in standing vehicle with motor running: RCW 46.61.685.